Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1478
Expenditure; limitations; reports required; violations; penalty.

(1)
An expenditure shall not be made, other than for overhead or normal operating
expenses, by an agent or an independent contractor, including an advertising
agency, on behalf of or for the benefit of a person unless the expenditure
is reported by the committee as if the expenditure were made directly by the
committee, or unless the agent or independent contractor files an agent's
expenditure report as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The agent
or independent contractor shall make known to the committee all information
required to be reported by the committee. Any person violating this subsection
shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) An expenditure
shall not be made, other than for overhead or normal operating expenses, by
a person gathering petition signatures on behalf of or for the benefit of
a person, including a ballot question committee, unless the expenditure is
reported by the ballot question committee as if the expenditure were made
directly by the committee, or unless the person gathering petition signatures
files an agent's expenditure report as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The person gathering petition signatures shall make known to the
committee all information required to be reported by the committee. For purposes
of this section, petition signature means a signature affixed to a petition
for the purpose of qualifying a ballot question to appear on a ballot. Any
person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(3)
A person gathering petition signatures, an agent, or an independent contractor
who is required to file an agent's report shall file a separate agent's report
for each person on whose behalf an expenditure is made. An agent's report
shall be filed with the commission within ten days after the end of the calendar
month in which the expenditure is made. An agent's report shall include:

(a)
The name, permanent address, temporary address, permanent telephone number,
and temporary telephone number of the person making expenditures for the purpose
of gathering signatures, the agent, or the independent contractor;

(b)
The name, address, and telephone number of the person on whose behalf the
expenditure is made;

(c) The name, permanent address, and temporary
address of the person to whom the expenditure is made, except that if the
expenditure is solely for the services of an individual circulating petitions,
such individual's name and address shall not be included;

(d)
The date and amount of each expenditure; and

(e) A description
of the goods or services purchased and the purpose of the goods or services.

(4)
A person required to report under subsection (3) of this section shall include
in the report the total amount paid to individual petition circulators during
the reporting period but shall not include the name, address, or telephone
number of any individual petition circulator if the only payment made to such
individual was for services as a petition circulator.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 78;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 51;

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB39, § 7.